Idaho, session 2025, H0332.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the State Board of Education and the Board
of Regents of the University of Idaho for Special Programs the following
amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and expense
classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026:
FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. FOREST UTILIZATION RESEARCH:
FROM:
General
Fund $19,500 $19,500
II. GEOLOGICAL SURVEY:
FROM:
General
Fund $12,800 $12,800
III. MUSEUM OF NATURAL HISTORY:
FROM:
General
Fund $5,600 $5,600
IV. SCHOLARSHIPS AND GRANTS:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,200 $1,375,000 $1,376,200


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
GRAND TOTAL $33,500 $5,600 $1,375,000 $1,414,100
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the State Board of Education and the Board of Regents of the University
of Idaho for Special Programs is hereby increased by twenty-seven hundredths
(0.27) for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.